District of Columbia statutes.
7-105

Report by Director.

Said Director of the Department of Human Services shall report in writing annually to said Mayor of the District of Columbia, and so much oftener as he shall require.

June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 107, ch. 180, § 9
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 6(a), 53 DCR 6794
1981 Ed., § 6-105.
1973 Ed., § 6-106.
D.C. Law 16-191 validated a previously made technical correction.
Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.